Hawaii statutes.
[§323B-4] Relationship to other laws. Nothing
in this chapter shall be construed to:

(1) Authorize the disclosure of individually
identifiable health information to the extent that disclosure is restricted by
federal law or regulations, including federal regulations about the
confidentiality of information about drugs and alcohol, as set forth in 42 Code
of Federal Regulations part 2;

(2) Compel the disclosure of individually
identifiable health information that is not required by law to be disclosed;

(3) Require a written authorization for release of
individually identifiable health information or de‑identified information
to the extent that the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996, Public Law 104-191, and its related regulations, as may be amended, does
not require such authorization;

(4) Limit or otherwise affect any state law that:

(A) Requires persons or entities to report
disease, injury, child abuse, elder abuse, domestic violence, birth, or death;
or

(B) Governs public health surveillance,
investigation, or intervention;

(5) Limit or otherwise affect health plan reporting,
including reporting required for purposes of state management or financial
audits; or

(6) Limit or otherwise affect any evidentiary
privilege, limitation on discovery, or confidentiality protection provided by
any state law, decision, or order in relation to individually identifiable
health information sought, used, or produced in any judicial or administrative
proceeding. [L 2012, c 315, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next